ja: トランポリン安全認証: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA準拠; EN 71; その他
fr: Certifications de sécurité pour les trampolines: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Conforme CPSIA; EN 71; Autre
hr-HR: Sigurnosni certifikati trampolina: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; U skladu sa standardom CPSIA; EN 71; Ostalo
fi: Trampoliinin turvallisuussertifioinnit: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA-yhteensopiva; EN 71; Muu
vi: Các chứng nhận an toàn của bạt nhún: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Tuân thủ CPSIA; EN 71; Khác
sv: Säkerhetscertifieringar för studsmatta: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA-kompatibel; EN 71; Övrigt
bg-BG: Сертификати за безопасност на батут: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Съвместимост с CPSIA; EN 71; Друго
tr: Trambolin güvenlik sertifikasyonları: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA uyumlu; EN 71; Diğer
pl: Certyfikacje bezpieczeństwa trampoliny: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Zgodność z CPSIA; EN 71; Inne
en: Trampoline safety certifications: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA compliant; EN 71; Other
ko: 트램펄린 안전 인증: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA 준수; EN 71; 기타
sl-SI: Varnostni certifikati za trampolin: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; V skladu s CPSIA; EN 71; Drugo
lt-LT: Batuto saugos sertifikatai: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Atitinka CPSIA; EN 71; Kita
ru: Сертификация безопасности батута: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Соответствие стандарту CPSIA; EN 71; Другое
el: Πιστοποιήσεις ασφαλείας τραμπολίνου: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Συμμορφώνεται με το CPSIA; EN 71; Άλλο
pt-BR: Certificações de segurança para colchões: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Em conformidade com CPSIA; EN 71; Outro
nb: Sikkerhetssertifiseringer for trampoline: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA-kompatibel; EN 71; Annet
it: Certificazioni di sicurezza del trampolino: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Conforme CPSIA; EN 71; Altro
zh-TW: 彈跳床安全認證: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; 符合 CPSIA 標準; EN 71; 其他
da: Sikkerhedscertificeringer for trampolin: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; I overensstemmelse med CPSIA; EN 71; Andet
ro-RO: Certificări de siguranță pentru trambulină: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Conform CPSIA; EN 71; Altele
sk-SK: Bezpečnostné certifikácie trampolíny: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; V súlade s CPSIA; EN 71; Iné
de: Sicherheitszertifizierungen des Trampolins: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA-konform; EN 71; Sonstige
pt-PT: Certificações de segurança para trampolins: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Conforme a CPSIA; EN 71; Outro
es: Certificaciones de seguridad de la cama elástica: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Cumple con la normativa CPSIA; EN 71; Otra
hu: Trambulin biztonsági tanúsítványai: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA-kompatibilis; EN 71; Egyéb
zh-CN: 蹦床安全认证: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; 符合 CPSIA 标准; EN 71; 其他
cs: Bezpečnostní certifikace trampolíny: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; Vyhovuje CPSIA; EN 71; Jiné
th: ใบรับรองความปลอดภัยของแทรมโพลีน: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; เป็นไปตามมาตรฐาน CPSIA; EN 71; อื่นๆ
nl: Veiligheidscertificeringen trampoline: AS 4989; ASTM F2225; ASTM F381; CPSIA-conform; EN 71; Overig